Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.535.030

Notice of election.

At the time of the adoption of the resolution provided for in RCW 28A.535.020, the board of directors shall direct the school district superintendent to give notice to the county auditor of the suggested time and purpose of such election, and specifying the amount and general character of the indebtedness proposed to be ratified. Such superintendent shall also cause written or printed notices to be posted in at least five places in such school district at least twenty days before such election. In addition to his or her other duties relating thereto, the county auditor shall give notice of such election as provided for in RCW 29A.52.355.

[ 2015 c 53 s 16; 1990 c 33 s 482; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.030. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 332 s 3; RRS s 4958; prior: 1897 c 118 s 131; 1895 c 21 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.52.030, 28.52.030.]